Massachusetts, session 194th, S1587.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 51 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the words “local anesthesia agents”, in line 27, the
following words:- “and nitrous oxide inhalation analgesia”.
of 1